Washington statutes.
RCW 43.10.110

Other powers and duties.

The attorney general shall have the power and it shall be his or her duty to perform any other duties that are, or may from time to time be required of him or her by law.

[ 2009 c 549 s 5052; 1965 c 8 s 43.10.110. Prior: 1929 c 92 s 8; RRS s 11034-2.]